Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6327
Lead-based paint professions; license; application; disciplinary actions; fees; continuing competency requirements.

(1) An applicant for a license in any of the lead-based paint professions prescribed in the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act shall be made as provided in the Uniform Credentialing Act. An individual shall be credentialed in the same manner as an individual under subsection (1) of section 38-121 and shall be subject to the disciplinary provisions of the Uniform Credentialing Act as provided in section 71-6331. The department shall establish and collect license and renewal fees as provided in sections 38-151 to 38-157.

(2) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish the continuing competency requirements pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act. Continuing education is sufficient to meet continuing competency requirements. The requirements may also include, but not be limited to, one or more of the continuing competency activities listed in section 38-145 which a licensee may select as an alternative to continuing education.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 175;

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 48;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 102;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1278.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.